Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB647.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5402YC (2) 91 dg/jh H.F. _____ Section 1. NEW SECTION . 554J.1 Definitions. 1 1. âArtificial intelligenceâ means a machine-based system 2 that, for any explicit or implicit objective, infers from the 3 input the system receives to generate output that can influence 4 physical or virtual environments. 5 2. âChatbotâ means an artificial intelligence that interacts 6 with users by simulating human conversation. 7 3. âDeployerâ means a person that owns an artificial 8 intelligence available for public use. 9 4. âMinorâ means an individual who is under eighteen years 10 of age. 11 5. âOutputâ means new content an artificial intelligence 12 generates based on a userâs input in relation to the data used 13 to train the artificial intelligence. âOutputâ includes but 14 is not limited to audio-visual media, images, predictions, 15 recommendations, and text. 16 6. âReasonable age verificationâ means verifying the age of 17 a user through any of the following: 18 a. Government-issued identification. 19 b. Financial documents that are reliable evidence of an 20 individualâs age. 21 c. A widely accepted practice that reliably evidences an 22 individualâs age. 23 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 554J.2 Chatbots ââ general deployer 24 requirements. 25 A deployer of a chatbot shall do all of the following: 26 1. Implement and maintain protocols meant to detect, 27 respond to, report, and mitigate harm the chatbot may cause a 28 user in a manner that prioritizes the safety and well-being of 29 users over the deployerâs interests. 30 2. Limit the collection and storage of user information 31 collected by the chatbot to what is necessary to fulfill the 32 deployerâs purpose for making the chatbot publicly available. 33 Sec. 3. NEW SECTION . 554J.3 Chatbot interactions with 34 minors. 35 -1- LSB 5402YC (2) 91 dg/jh 1/ 4 H.F. _____ 1. A deployer shall implement reasonable age verification 1 measures to ensure that a minor cannot use or purchase a 2 chatbot the deployer makes publicly available. 3 2. Notwithstanding subsection 1, a deployer may make a 4 chatbot available for a minorâs use or purchase if all of the 5 following apply: 6 a. The chatbot was designed for the primary purpose of 7 providing mental health support, counseling, or therapy by 8 diagnosing, treating, mitigating, or preventing a mental health 9 condition. 10 b. The chatbot provides a clear and conspicuous disclaimer 11 at the beginning of each interaction with the chatbot that the 12 chatbot is an artificial intelligence and is not a licensed 13 professional. 14 c. The chatbot was recommended for the minorâs use by an 15 individual licensed under chapter 154B or 154D after performing 16 an evaluation of the minor. 17 d. The chatbotâs developer has significant documentation of 18 how the chatbot was tested. 19 e. Peer-reviewed clinical trial data exists demonstrating 20 the chatbot would be a safe, effective tool for the minorâs 21 diagnosis, treatment, mitigation, or prevention of a mental 22 health condition. 23 f. The chatbotâs deployer provided clear disclosures of the 24 chatbotâs functions, limitations, and data privacy policies to 25 the individual recommending the chatbot under paragraph âcâ , 26 and to the minorâs parents, guardians, or custodians. 27 g. The chatbotâs deployer developed and implemented 28 protocols for testing the chatbot for risks to users, 29 identifying possible risks the chatbot poses to users, 30 mitigating risks the chatbot poses to users, and quickly 31 rectifying harm the chatbot may have caused a user. 32 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 554J.4 Enforcement. 33 1. The attorney general may bring an action on behalf of the 34 state to enforce the provisions of this chapter and may seek an 35 -2- LSB 5402YC (2) 91 dg/jh 2/ 4 H.F. _____ injunction for violations of this chapter. 1 2. a. A court may issue a civil penalty of not more than 2 two thousand five hundred dollars for each violation of this 3 chapter, or seven thousand five hundred dollars if a person 4 violates an injunction issued under this chapter. 5 b. Penalties assessed under this subsection shall be 6 deposited into the general fund of the state. 7 3. The parent, guardian, or custodian of a minor who uses 8 a chatbot that does not comply with this chapter may bring an 9 action to recover a civil penalty of not less than one hundred 10 dollars but not more than seven hundred fifty dollars or actual 11 damages, whichever is greater. 12